src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_cavos_nongradable_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - čavos: # MLO, ok; A_CAVOS
    čavos+A+Attr: čapo 
    čavos+A+Sg+Nom: čavos
    čavos+A+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+A+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+A+Sg+Ill: čaposân
    čavos+A+Sg+Loc: čaposist
    čavos+A+Sg+Com: čaposáin
    čavos+A+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+A+Ess: [čaposin, čavosin]
    čavos+A+Par: [čaposid, čavosid]
    čavos+A+Pl+Nom: čaposeh
    čavos+A+Pl+Gen: čaposij
    čavos+A+Pl+Acc: čaposijd
    čavos+A+Pl+Ill: čaposáid
    čavos+A+Pl+Loc: čaposijn
    čavos+A+Pl+Com: [čaposijguin, čaposijgijn]
    čavos+A+Pl+Abe: čaposijttáá
